lexc/num/enhunum1.lexc
LEXICON Case1marhet
+Abl:^+cAbl^§t§§oooe§l      #;  ! tól, től
!+Acc[lfea]:^+cAcc^§oeoez2§t       #;  ! ot, et, öt, t
+Ade:^+cAde^§n§§AAA§l       #;  ! nál, nél
+All:^+cAll^§h§§oeoe§z      #;  ! hoz, hez, höz
+Cau:^+cCau^ért             #;  ! ért
+Dat:^+cDat^§n§§AA§k        #;  ! nak, nek
+Del:^+cDel^§r§§oooe§l      #;  ! ról, ről
+Ess:^+cEss^§uue§l          #;    ! ul, ül
+Ela:^+cEla^§b§§oooe§l      #;  ! ból, ből
+Fac:^+cFac^§VV§§AAA§       #;  ! vá, vé
+Forp:^+ccForp^§k§épp          #;  ! ként, képp, képpen
+Forpen:^+cxForpen^§k§éppen          #;  ! ként, képp, képpen
+For:^+cFor^§k§ént          #;  ! ként, képp, képpen
+Ill:^+cIll^§b§§AA§         #;  ! ból, ből
+Ine:^+cIne^§b§§AA§n        #;  ! ban, ben
+Ins:^+cIns^§VV§§AA§l       #;  ! val, vel
+Nom:^+cNom^0               #;  ! 
+Sub:^+cSub^§r§§AA§         #;  ! ra, re
+Sup:^+cSup^§oeoezoa§n        #;  ! on, en, ön, n
+Ter:^+cTer^ig              #;  ! ig

LEXICON Submarhet
+Sub:^+cSub^§r§§AA§         #;  ! ra, re
+Iadj:^+cIadj^i         #;  ! ra, re
+Kas:^+cKas^§oeanr§s     #;  !as,es,ös képző
                            #;

!hét:het
LEXICON AddNumketthet
[stem]+Num[gcat]:0     Possketthet;
+Num:0     Plurketthet;

LEXICON Possketthet
+Dis:^+cDis^§ooez3§nként    #;    ! anként, enként
+Soc:^+cSoc^§EOA§st§uue§l   #;    ! astul, estül
+Par[lfea]:^+cPar^§aeoenr§d       Szorketthet;  ! od,ed,öd
+Posss1s:^+cPosss1s^§OEOE1§m   Famketthet;   ! m
+Posss2s:^+cPosss2s^§OEOE1§d   Famketthet;   ! d
+Posss3s:^+cPosss3s^§JPnull§§AE1§   Famketthet;   ! ja, je, a,e
+Possp1s:^+cPossp1s^§UUE§nk   Famketthet;   ! unk, ünk
+Possp2s:^+cPossp2s^§OEOE1§t§OEOE§k   Famketthet;   ! etek, atok
+Possp3s:^+cPossp3s^§JPnull§§UUE1§k   Famketthet;   ! ük, uk
+Posss1p:^+cPosss1p^§JPnull§§AE§im   Famketthet;   ! aim
+Posss2p:^+cPosss2p^§JPnull§§AE§id   Famketthet;   ! aid
+Posss3p:^+cPosss3p^§JPnull§§AE§i   Famketthet;   ! ai, jai, ei, jei
+Possp1p:^+cPossp1p^§JPnull§§AE§ink   Famketthet;   ! aink, eink
+Possp2p:^+cPossp2p^§JPnull§§AE§it§OEOE2§k   Famketthet;  ! aitok, eitek
+Possp3p:^+cPossp3p^§JPnull§§AE§ik   Famketthet;   !aik, jaik, eik, jeik
                                  Case1ketthet;

LEXICON Plurketthet
+Plur:^+cPlur^§oeoez1§k    Genketthet;
                            Case1ketthet;

LEXICON Famketthet
+Fam:^+cFam^ék         Genketthet;
                       Genketthet;

LEXICON Genketthet
+Gens:^+cGens^é          Caseketthet;
+Genpl:^+cGenpl^éi     Caseketthet;
                       Caseketthet1;
 
LEXICON Caseketthet
+Abl:^+cAbl^§t§§oooe§l      #;  ! tól, től
+Acc[lfea]:^+cAcc^§oeoez2§t       #;  ! ot, et, öt, t
+Ade:^+cAde^§n§§AAA§l       #;  ! nál, nél
+All:^+cAll^§h§§oeoe§z      #;  ! hoz, hez, höz
+Cau:^+cCau^ért             #;  ! ért
+Dat:^+cDat^§n§§AA§k        #;  ! nak, nek
+Del:^+cDel^§r§§oooe§l      #;  ! ról, ről
+Ess:^+cEss^§uue§l          #;    ! ul, ül
+Ela:^+cEla^§b§§oooe§l      #;  ! ból, ből
+Fac:^+cFac^§VV§§AAA§       #;  ! vá, vé
+Forp:^+ccForp^§k§épp          #;  ! ként, képp, képpen
+Forpen:^+cxForpen^§k§éppen          #;  ! ként, képp, képpen
+For:^+cFor^§k§ént          #;  ! ként, képp, képpen
+Ill:^+cIll^§b§§AA§         #;  ! ból, ből
+Ine:^+cIne^§b§§AA§n        #;  ! ban, ben
+Ins:^+cIns^§VV§§AA§l       #;  ! val, vel
+Nom:^+cNom^0               #;  ! 
+Sub:^+cSub^§r§§AA§         #;  ! ra, re
+Sup:^+cSup^§oeoez§n        #;  ! on, en, ön, n
+Ter:^+cTer^ig              #;  ! ig

LEXICON Caseketthet1
+Abl:^+cAbl^§t§§oooe§l      #;  ! tól, től
+Acc[lfea]:^+cAcc^§oeoez2§t       #;  ! ot, et, öt, t
+Ade:^+cAde^§n§§AAA§l       #;  ! nál, nél
+All:^+cAll^§h§§oeoe§z      #;  ! hoz, hez, höz
+Cau:^+cCau^ért             #;  ! ért
+Dat:^+cDat^§n§§AA§k        #;  ! nak, nek
+Del:^+cDel^§r§§oooe§l      #;  ! ról, ről
+Ess:^+cEss^§uue§l          #;    ! ul, ül
+Ela:^+cEla^§b§§oooe§l      #;  ! ból, ből
+Fac:^+cFac^§VV§§AAA§       #;  ! vá, vé
+Forp:^+ccForp^§k§épp          #;  ! ként, képp, képpen
+Forpen:^+cxForpen^§k§éppen          #;  ! ként, képp, képpen
+For:^+cFor^§k§ént          #;  ! ként, képp, képpen
+Ill:^+cIll^§b§§AA§         #;  ! ból, ből
+Ine:^+cIne^§b§§AA§n        #;  ! ban, ben
+Ins:^+cIns^§VV§§AA§l       #;  ! val, vel
+Nom:^+cNom^0               #;  ! 
+Sub:^+cSub^§r§§AA§         #;  ! ra, re
+Sup:^+cSup^§oeoezoa§n        #;  ! on, en, ön, n
+Ter:^+cTer^ig              #;  ! ig

LEXICON Case1ketthet
+Acc[lfea]:^+cAcc^§oeoez2§t       #;  ! ot, et, öt, t
+Sup:^+cSup^§oeoezoa§n        #;  ! on, en, ön, n

LEXICON Szorketthet
+Tmp:^+cTmp^sz§oeanr§r      Subketthet;  ! szor, szer, ször
+Ik[lfea]:^+cIk^ik                NumAcc;  ! ik
                            #;
LEXICON Subketthet
+Sub:^+cSub^§r§§AA§         #;  ! ra, re
+Iadj:^+cIadj^i         #;  ! ra, re
+Kas:^+cKas^§oeanr§s     #;  !as,es,ös képző
                            #;


LEXICON AddNumkett
[stem]+Num[gcat]:0     Posskett;

LEXICON Posskett
+Par[lfea]:^+cPar^§aeoenr§d       Szorkett;  ! od,ed,öd

LEXICON Szorkett
+Tmp:^+cTmp^sz§oeanr§r      Subkett;  ! szor, szer, ször
+Ik[lfea]:^+cIk^ik                NumAcc;  ! ik
                            #;
LEXICON Subkett
+Sub:^+cSub^§r§§AA§         #;  ! ra, re
+Iadj:^+cIadj^i         #;  ! ra, re
+Kas:^+cKas^§oeanr§s     #;  !as,es,ös képző
                            #;


LEXICON AddNumkett2
[stem]+Num[gcat]:0     Posskett;
+Num:0     Casekett2;

LEXICON Casekett2
+Sup:^+cSup^en        #;  ! on, en, ön, n



LEXICON AddNumketta
[stem]+Num[gcat]:0     Possketta;

LEXICON Possketta
+Par[lfea]:^+cPar^§aeoenra§d       Szorketta;  ! od,ed,öd

LEXICON Szorketta
+Tmp:^+cTmp^§sz§§oeanr§r      Subketta;  ! szor, szer, ször
+Ik[lfea]:^+cIk^ik                NumAcc;  ! ik
                            #;
LEXICON Subketta
+Sub:^+cSub^§r§§AA§         #;  ! ra, re
+Iadj:^+cIadj^i         #;  ! ra, re
+Kas:^+cKas^§oeanr§s     #;  !as,es,ös képző
                            #;

!kettő:két
LEXICON AddNumket
[stem]+Num[gcat]:0     Szorket;

LEXICON Szorket
+Tmp:^+cTmp^sz§oeanr§r      Subket;  ! szor, szer, ször
+Ik[lfea]:^+cIk^ik                NumAcc;  ! ik
                            #;
LEXICON Subket
+Sub:^+cSub^§r§§AA§         #;  ! ra, re
+Iadj:^+cIadj^i         #;  ! ra, re
+Kas:^+cKas^§oeanr§s     #;  !as,es,ös képző
                            #;

LEXICON AddNumkettharom
[stem]+Num[gcat]:0     Posskettharom;

LEXICON Posskettharom
+Par[lfea]:^+cPar^§aeoenra§d       Szorkettharom;  ! od,ed,öd

LEXICON Szorkettharom
+Tmp:^+cTmp^sz§oeanr§r      Subkettharom;  ! szor, szer, ször
+Ik[lfea]:^+cIk^ik                NumAcc;  ! ik
                            #;

LEXICON Subkettharom
+Sub:^+cSub^§r§§AA§         #;  ! ra, re
+Iadj:^+cIadj^i         #;  ! ra, re
+Kas:^+cKas^§oeanr§s     #;  !as,es,ös képző
                            #;


LEXICON AddNummkette
+Num:0     Casekette;
 
LEXICON Casekette
+Abl:^+cAbl^§t§§oooe§l      #;  ! tól, től
+Acc[lfea]:^+cAcc^§oeoez2§t       #;  ! ot, et, öt, t
+Ade:^+cAde^§n§§AAA§l       #;  ! nál, nél
+All:^+cAll^§h§§oeoe§z      #;  ! hoz, hez, höz
+Cau:^+cCau^ért             #;  ! ért
+Dat:^+cDat^§n§§AA§k        #;  ! nak, nek
+Del:^+cDel^§r§§oooe§l      #;  ! ról, ről
+Ess:^+cEss^§uue§l          #;    ! ul, ül
+Ela:^+cEla^§b§§oooe§l      #;  ! ból, ből
+Fac:^+cFac^§VV§§AAA§       #;  ! vá, vé
+Forp:^+ccForp^§k§épp          #;  ! ként, képp, képpen
+Forpen:^+cxForpen^§k§éppen          #;  ! ként, képp, képpen
+For:^+cFor^§k§ént          #;  ! ként, képp, képpen
+Ill:^+cIll^§b§§AA§         #;  ! ból, ből
+Ine:^+cIne^§b§§AA§n        #;  ! ban, ben
+Ins:^+cIns^§VV§§AA§l       #;  ! val, vel
+Nom:^+cNom^0               #;  ! 
+Sub:^+cSub^§r§§AA§         #;  ! ra, re
+Sup:^+cSup^§oeoezoa§n        #;  ! on, en, ön, n
+Ter:^+cTer^ig              #;  ! ig

LEXICON AddNumoet
[stem]+Num[gcat]:0     Possoet;
+Num:0     Pluroet;
+Num:0     Famoet;

LEXICON Num
kettő:két AddNumket;
kettő:kett AddNumkett2; ! od odszor odik
három:harm AddNumkettharom; 
négy:negy AddNumkett; 
öt AddNumoet; 
hét:het AddNumketthet; 
